Hawaii statutes.
§122A-14 Acceptance of gratuities. No
member of the Hawaii state defense force, by reason of membership therein,
shall solicit or accept any compensation, gift, donation, gratuity, or thing of
value from any source whatever except the pay and allowances provided under
this chapter. Any person who violates this section shall be punished as may be
directed by nonjudicial punishment or a court-martial. [L 1987, c 35, pt of §1;
am L 1988, c 135, §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next